analyzer/odimorph.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+1 +2 +3
+Sg +Pl
+Hon +Infr
+Anim +Inanim
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Instr +Loc +Abl
^GUESSNOUNSTEM

LEXICON Root
0:0 Stem;

LEXICON Stem
^GUESSNOUNSTEM Number;

LEXICON Number
+Sg+Anim:0 AnimCase;
+Sg+Inanim:0 InanimCase;
+Pl+Anim:ମାନେ AnimCase;
+Pl+Inanim:ଗୁଡିକ InanimCase;

LEXICON AnimCase
+Nom:0 #;
+Acc:କୁ #;
+Gen:ର #;
+Instr:ରେ #;
+Loc:ରେ #;
+Abl:ରୁ #;

LEXICON InanimCase
+Instr:ଦ୍ୱର #;
+Loc:ଠାରେ #;
+Abl:ଠାରୁ #;
